Utah statutes.
63C-12-103.   Council creation -- Members -- Terms.

(1)  There is created a state advisory council known as the "Snake Valley Aquifer Advisory Council."

(2)  The advisory council is composed of the following seven members:

(a)  the governor or the governor's designee; and

(b)  six members appointed by the governor as follows:

(i)  two county commissioners, from individuals recommended by an organization that represents counties in the state, who are residents of:

(A)  Tooele County;

(B)  Juab County;

(C)  Millard County; or

(D)  Beaver County;

(ii)  one elected representative of Salt Lake County government, from individuals recommended by an organization that represents counties in the state;

(iii)  two residents of:

(A)  Tooele County;

(B)  Juab County;

(C)  Millard County; or

(D)  Beaver County; and

(iv)  a representative of the Confederate Tribes of Goshute Reservation.

(3)  A member appointed under Subsection (2)(b) is appointed to a two-year term.

(4)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of council members appointed under Subsection (2)(b) are staggered so that approximately half of the council is appointed every two years.

(5)  The governor shall appoint a chairperson.

(6)  If a vacancy occurs in council membership for any reason the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as the vacated member was appointed.



Enacted by Chapter 262, 2009 General Session

